Wyoming, session 2025, SF0104.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 2-1-201(a)(i), 2-1-204(a)(i),
2-1-205(a), 2-1-403 by creating a new subsection (d),
2-11-201 and 2-11-202(a)(intro) are amended to read:
2-1-201. Payment of indebtedness and delivery of
tangible personal property or instruments evidencing debt.
(a) Not earlier than thirty (30) days after the death
of a decedent, any person indebted to the decedent or
having possession of tangible personal property or an
instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock or chose in
action belonging to the decedent shall make payment of the
indebtedness or deliver the tangible personal property or
the instrument evidencing the debt, obligation, stock or
chose in action to the person or persons claiming to be the
distributee or distributees of the property or the attorney
for the distributee or distributees, upon being presented
an affidavit, filed as provided by subsection (c) of this
section, made by or on behalf of the distributee or
distributees stating:
(i) The value of the entire estate located in
Wyoming subject to administration, either testate or
intestate, less liens and encumbrances, does not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) four hundred
thousand dollars ($400,000.00);
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0104
ENROLLED ACT NO. 85, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
2-1-204. Collection of claims of certain creditors of
decedent by affidavit.
(a) Not earlier than ninety (90) days after the death
of a decedent, the United States, or any agency or
instrumentality thereof, or the state of Wyoming, or any
agency, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof,
to whom the decedent was indebted or to whom the decedent's
estate would be indebted if the estate were being
administered upon, may collect all of the assets of the
decedent referred to in W.S. 2-1-201, upon presentation of
an affidavit to the parties referred to in W.S. 2-1-201,
stating:
(i) The value of the entire estate, wherever
located, less liens and encumbrances, does not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) four hundred
thousand dollars ($400,000.00);
2-1-205. Summary procedure for distribution of
personal or real property; application for decree; notice
by publication; presumptive evidence of title; effect of
false statements.
(a) If any person dies who is the owner of personal
or real property, including mineral interests, but whose
entire estate including personal property does not exceed
two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) four hundred
thousand dollars ($400,000.00), less liens and
encumbrances, the person or persons claiming to be the
distributee or distributees of the decedent may file, not
earlier than thirty (30) days after the decedent's death,
an application for a decree of summary distribution of
property.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0104
ENROLLED ACT NO. 85, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
2-1-403. Qualification; effective date.
(d) A written irrevocable disclaimer of an interest
in property that does not otherwise qualify as a qualified
disclaimer under subsection (a) or (b) of this section
shall be effective to terminate and pass an interest in
property if the disclaiming party acknowledges in a prior
or contemporaneous writing that the disclaimer does not
qualify as a disclaimer for federal or other tax purposes
under this section.
2-11-201. Probate of estates of nonresidents.
In case of a nonresident's estate having property in this
state not exceeding in value the sum of two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000.00) four hundred thousand
dollars ($400,000.00), which estate has been duly probated
and settled in another state, the probate of the estate in
this state may be dispensed with upon filing with the
district judge in the proper county a petition under oath
showing the facts in the case together with certified
copies of the petition, order of appointment of executor or
administrator, inventory and final decree of distribution
of estate therein, and a full showing that debts of the
estate have been paid and the district judge giving notice
by publication for the period of three (3) weeks of the
intention of the petitioner to have the probate proceedings
admitted in this state as a probate of the estate. If on
the day set for hearing the petition no objection is made,
the judge shall make an order admitting the certified
copies of the proceedings in the estate to record in his
court and they shall be considered and treated from that
time as original proceedings in his court and shall be
conclusive evidence of the facts therein shown. If at such
hearing any creditor objects to the proceedings and shows
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0104
ENROLLED ACT NO. 85, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
that the decedent is indebted to him, his claim not having
been presented in the original state, the matter shall be
postponed and the creditor or other person shall be allowed
to petition for letters of administration as in other
cases. This section shall not be construed to prevent the
courts of this state from appointing a temporary
administrator in this state to collect and preserve the
property of the estate of the deceased person which may be
located in this state.
2-11-202. Nonresident property in Wyoming;
disposition.
(a) In case of a nonresident's estate having property
in this state not exceeding in value the sum of two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000.00) four hundred thousand
dollars ($400,000.00), which estate is being duly probated
and settled in another state, the Wyoming district judge
may enter an order for the sale of the property located in
this state provided:
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0104
ENROLLED ACT NO. 85, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5